District of Columbia statutes.
47-311

Estimate of expenditures by Mayor.

The Mayor shall, within 10 days of receipt of a request of the chairperson of a Council committee (excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays), estimate the cost of all expenditures to be incurred by the District of Columbia government under permanent legislation to be adopted by the Council. Within 30 days of the effective date of this section, the Mayor shall adopt standards by which to make such determinations and shall submit such standards to the Council for its disapproval in whole or in part within 30 days of receipt.

History

Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-92, § 703, 27 DCR 3390
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-311.

Mayor's Orders

Mayor’s Advisory Committee on Finance and Taxes established: See Mayor’s Order 88-59, March 15, 1988.

Finances and Taxes Advisory Committee abolished: The Finances and Taxes Advisory Committee, established by Mayor’s Order 92-1, January 6, 1992, was abolished by § 401(o) of D.C. Law 12-86.

[Reserved].